Utah statutes.
31A-5-218.   Subsidiaries.
(1)  Subject to the limitations under Subsection 31A-18-106(1)(k), an
insurance corporation may form or acquire subsidiaries to do any lawful
insurance business.
(2)  An insurance corporation may form or acquire subsidiaries to hold or
manage any assets that it might hold or manage directly.
(3) (a)  An insurance corporation may form or acquire subsidiaries to perform
functions or provide services that are ancillary to its insurance operations.
(b)  A subsidiary is an ancillary subsidiary if it is engaged principally in
one or more of the following:
(i)  acting as an insurance producer;
(ii)  investing, reinvesting, or trading in securities, or acting as a
securities broker, dealer, or marketing representative;
(iii)  managing investment companies registered under the federal Investment
Company Act of 1940, as amended, including related sales and services;
(iv)  providing investment advice and services;
(v)  acting as administrative agent for a government instrumentality
performing an insurance, public assistance, or related function;
(vi)  providing services related to insurance operations, including
accounting, actuarial, pension administration, appraisal, auditing, claims
adjusting, collection, data processing, communications, loss prevention,
premium financing, safety engineering, and underwriting services;
(vii)  holding or managing property used by the corporation, alone or with its
affiliates for the convenient transaction of its business;
(viii)  engaging in the motor club business under Chapter 11, Motor Clubs;
(ix)  engaging in the business of any institution subject to the jurisdiction
of the Department of Financial Institutions under Title 7, Financial
Institutions;
(x)  providing similar services or performing similar activities which the
commissioner declares ancillary by rule; and
(xi)  owning corporations that would be authorized as subsidiaries under
Subsections (3)(b)(i) through (3)(b)(ix) and under Subsections (1) and (2).
(4)  An insurance corporation may form or acquire subsidiaries other than
those under Subsections (1) through (3), but only to the extent the insurer
has excess surplus as defined under Section 31A-1-301.
(5) (a)  An insurance corporation shall notify the commissioner immediately
following the formation or acquisition of a subsidiary under this section.
(b)  Chapter 16 provides additional requirements that are applicable to the
acquisition of certain subsidiaries.
